West Virginia, session 2025, HB2138.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-9b. Adoption awareness materials. (a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public school in the state may make available material on adoption awareness from the West Virginia Department of Human Services to students enrolled in grades nine through 12 (9-12) at the public school and/or with the school counselor.  The public school shall require that the adoption awareness material required under this section is provided upon request by any student.(b) The State Board of Education shall develop written standards and information relating to adoption awareness material required by this section.(c) Adoption awareness material required by this section shall include without limitation:(1) The types of adoption available;(2) The difference between adoption through the foster care system and private adoption;(3) Public and private resources and agencies available to assist in the adoption process;(4) Public and private resources available for pregnant mothers and parents enrolled in public school; and(5) A description of child and human development.(d) A public school shall provide any information provided to students under this section that is in written form to the parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to a pregnant student who is enrolled in the public school.